District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.28

Repealed

Voting of shares — Determination of shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at meeting; closing of transfer books and fixing record date.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 191, ch. 269, § 28
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.28.
1981 Ed., § 29-328.
1973 Ed., § 29-912.